Hawaii statutes.
§88-27 Oath of trustees. Each trustee
shall, within ten days after the trustee's appointment or election, take an
oath of office that, so far as it devolves upon the trustee, the trustee will
diligently and honestly administer the affairs of the board of trustees, and
that the trustee will not knowingly violate or willingly permit to be violated
any of the provisions of law applicable to the system. The oath shall be
subscribed to by the member making it and certified by the officer before whom
it is taken and shall be immediately filed in the office of the lieutenant
governor. [L 1925, c 55, §5(5); RL 1935, pt of §7924; RL 1945, pt of §707; RL
1955, §6-64; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §9; HRS §88-27; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1;
gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Employees' retirement system (ERS) board of trustee's
contention that no statute in chapter 88 provides that ERS owes a duty to
individual members to provide individual notice and counseling, particularly
absent a request for information was incorrect where, reading §88-127 and this
section in para materia, the ERS board is charged with the duty to diligently
and honestly administer all funds held in trust for the exclusive use and
benefit of the system and for the members of the system. 108 H. 338, 120 P.3d
237.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next